Hawaii statutes.
[§235-110.94] Organic foods
production tax credit. [Section repealed December 31, 2021. L 2016, c
258, §5.] (a) There shall be allowed to each qualified taxpayer subject
to the tax imposed under this chapter, an income tax credit that shall be
deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by
this chapter for the taxable year in which the credit is properly claimed.

(b) The amount of the tax credit shall be
equal to the qualified expenses of the qualified taxpayer, up to a maximum of
$50,000.

(c) In the case of a partnership, S
corporation, estate, or trust, the tax credit allowable is for qualified
expenses incurred by the entity for the taxable year. The expenses upon which
the tax credit is computed shall be determined at the entity level.
Distribution and share of credit shall be determined by rule.

(d) The total amount of tax credits allowed
under this section shall not exceed $2,000,000 for all qualified taxpayers in
any taxable year; provided that any taxpayer who is not eligible to claim the
credit in a taxable year due to the $2,000,000 cap having been exceeded
for that taxable year shall be eligible to claim the credit in the subsequent
taxable year.

(e) Every qualified taxpayer, before March 31
of each year in which qualified expenses were incurred by the taxpayer in the
previous taxable year, shall submit a written, certified statement to the
chairperson of the board of agriculture identifying:

(1) Qualified expenses incurred in the previous
taxable year; and

(2) The amount of the tax credit claimed by the
taxpayer pursuant to this section, if any, in the previous taxable year.

(f) The department of agriculture shall:

(1) Maintain records of the names and addresses of
the qualified taxpayers claiming the credits under this section and the total
amount of the qualified expenses upon which the tax credits are based;

(2) Verify the nature and amount of the qualified
expenses;

(3) Total all qualified and cumulative expenses that
the department certifies; and

(4) Certify the amount of the tax credit for each
taxpayer for each taxable year and the cumulative amount of the tax credit.

Upon each determination made under this
subsection, the department of agriculture shall issue a certificate to the
taxpayer verifying information submitted to the department of agriculture,
including amounts of qualified expenses, the credit amount certified for the
taxpayer for each taxable year, and the cumulative amount of tax credits
certified. The taxpayer shall file the certificate with the taxpayer's tax
return with the department of taxation.

The board of agriculture may assess and collect
a fee to offset the costs of certifying tax credit claims under this section.

(g) The director of taxation:

(1) Shall prepare any forms that may be necessary to
claim a tax credit under this section;

(2) May require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable
information to ascertain the validity of the claim for the tax credit made
under this section; and

(3) May adopt rules under chapter 91 necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section.

(h) If the tax credit under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's net income tax liability, the excess of the credit over
liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's net income tax liability
in subsequent years until exhausted. All claims for the tax credit under this
section, including amended claims, shall be filed on or before the end of the
twelfth month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit may
be claimed. Failure to comply with the foregoing provision shall constitute a
waiver of the right to claim the credit.

(i) As used in this section:

"Net income tax liability" means
income tax liability reduced by all other credits allowed under this chapter.

"Organic Foods Production Act" means
the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990, as amended (7 United States
Code section 6501 et seq.).

"Organic system plan" has the same
meaning as provided in 7 Code of Federal Regulations section 205.2.

"Qualified expenses" means expenses
incurred by a qualified taxpayer to produce organically produced agricultural
products, including expenses incurred to obtain organic certification from the
United States Department of Agriculture, pursuant to the Organic Foods Production
Act. "Qualified expenses" include:

(1) Application fees;

(2) Inspection costs;

(3) Fees related to equivalency agreement/arrangement
requirements, travel/per diem for inspectors, user fees, sales assessments, and
postage; and

(4) Costs for any equipment, materials, or supplies
necessary for organic certification or production of agricultural products, in
accordance with the qualified taxpayer's organic system plan and the organic
production and handling requirements of the National Organic Program, codified
at 7 Code of Federal Regulations part 205, subpart C, including but not limited
to certified organic seed, cover crops, or animal feed.

"Qualified expenses" shall not include any
amount refunded or to be refunded to the taxpayer by the United States
Department of Agriculture's organic certification cost-share program or any
other similar financial assistance program.

"Qualified taxpayer" means a
producer, handler, or handling operation, as those terms are defined in title 7
United States Code section 6502:

(1) That sells agricultural products in adherence to
the standards and requirements of the Organic Foods Production Act;

(2) That has applied for organic certification, in
accordance with the requirements of the Organic Foods Production Act; and

(3) Whose gross income from the sale of organically
produced agricultural products for the most recently reported fiscal year
totals no more than $500,000. [L 2016, c 258, §2]

Note

Section applies to taxable years beginning after December 31,
2016. L 2016, c 258, §5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next